Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB841.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 806(d.1)(3) of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act, is amended and subsections (d) and (d.1) are amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 806. Licensure.* * *(d) Home health care agency regulations.--* * *(7) Individuals employed by a home health care agency or a home care agency or registry providing home health aide 12345678910111213141516171819202122 services or personal assistance services shall complete at least four hours of initial training and at least two hours of continued training regarding the treatment and care for persons with dementia, the credit for which shall be portable between employment within this Commonwealth. The following shall apply to the training requirements under this paragraph:(i) Initial dementia training shall include the topics of Alzheimer's disease and dementia, person-centered care, assessment and care planning, activities of daily living and dementia-related behaviors and communication.(ii) In addition to the initial training, continued education shall include new information on best practices in the treatment and care of persons with dementia.(iii) To provide training, an entity must submit a proposed curriculum for review and validation to the department, on a form and in a manner as determined by the department. The department shall select a training entity with experience in the development and implementation of relevant curriculum in this Commonwealth. Initial training is considered complete once the individual takes and passes an evaluation, as determined by the department.(iv) Within one year of the effective date of this paragraph, the department shall promulgate regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this paragraph.(d.1) Home care agency and home care registry licensure requirements.--* * *20250SB0841PN0926 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Documentation of compliance with at least one of the training requirements under paragraph (1) and the training requirements under paragraph (7) shall be maintained in each individual's file in the home care agency or home care registry office. Documentation of applicable State licensure for any health care practitioner shall also be maintained on file in the home care agency or registry office.* * *(7) (i) In addition to the requirements under this subsection, the following individuals must complete at least four hours of initial training and at least two hours of continued training regarding the treatment and care for persons with dementia, which shall be portable between employment within this Commonwealth:(A) A direct care worker providing personal assistant services in Office of Long-Term Living participant-directed service models within the Community Health Choices Program and programs authorized under the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1987 (Public Law 100-203, 101 Stat. 1330).(B) An individual with direct consumer contact employed by a home care agency.(C) An individual referred to a consumer by a home care registry after the effective date of this clause.(ii) The following shall apply to the training requirements under subparagraph (i):(A) Initial dementia training shall include the topics of Alzheimer's disease and dementia, person-centered care, assessment and care planning, 20250SB0841PN0926 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 activities of daily living and dementia-related behaviors and communication.(B) To provide training, an entity must submit a proposed curriculum for review and validation to the department, on a form and in a manner as determined by the department. The department shall select a training entity with experience in the development and implementation of relevant curriculum in this Commonwealth. Initial training is considered complete once the individual takes and passes an evaluation, as determined by the department.(C) Continued education shall include new information on best practices in the treatment and care of persons with dementia. Individuals employed by a home health care agency shall complete two hours of continued training annually.(iii) Within one year of the effective date of this paragraph, the department shall promulgate regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this paragraph.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0841PN0926 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021